languagetool-language-modules/wa/src/main/resources/org/languagetool/resource/wa/hunspell/wa_BE.aff
SET cp1252
WORDCHARS -’'1234567890
TRY ersainthocuxdlpéymbzîvjåfèwgkêôûçERSAINTHOCUXDLPÉYMBZÎVJÅFÈWGKÊÔÛ'Ç

MAP 6
MAP aàâäåAÀÂÄÅ
MAP eéèêëEÉÈÊË
MAP iîïyIÎÏY
MAP oôöOÔÖ
MAP uùûüUÙÛÜ
MAP cçCÇ


BREAK 7
BREAK -
BREAK .
BREAK ·
BREAK ^'
BREAK ^‘
BREAK '$
BREAK ’$

ICONV 1
ICONV ’ '

OCONV 1
OCONV ' ’

NEEDAFFIX *

PFX L Y 2
PFX L 0 l' [aàâeèéêiîoôuyhœæ]
PFX L 0 k' [aàâeèéêiîoôuyhœæ]

PFX i Y 65
PFX i 0 0 er sp:plin sp:O
PFX i   er r er sp:spotch
PFX i   er ri er sp:plin sp:C sp:E
PFX i 0 0 es sp:plin sp:O
PFX i   es s es sp:spotch
PFX i   es si es sp:plin sp:C sp:E
PFX i   be b be sp:spotch
PFX i   de d de sp:spotch
PFX i   me m me sp:spotch
PFX i   se s se sp:spotch
PFX i   ve v ve sp:spotch
PFX i   chi ch chi[^y] sp:spotch
PFX i   di d di[^gsy] sp:spotch
PFX i   di d dign sp:spotch
PFX i   di d dis[^s] sp:spotch
PFX i   dis d diss sp:spotch
PFX i   di d diy[^iî] sp:spotch
PFX i   dji dj dji sp:spotch
PFX i   fi f fi[^y] sp:spotch
PFX i   gni gn gni[^y] sp:spotch
PFX i   0 0 ki sp:plin sp:E
PFX i   ki co ki sp:plin sp:O sp:C
PFX i   ki c ki[^eéèêhiîsy] sp:spotch
PFX i   ki k ki[eéèêhiî] sp:spotch
PFX i   ki c kis[^cs] sp:spotch
PFX i   kis c kiss sp:spotch
PFX i   kiy ki kiy[^iî] sp:spotch
PFX i   ki k kiy[iî] sp:spotch
PFX i   li l li[^y] sp:spotch
PFX i   pi p pi[^y] sp:spotch
PFX i   0 0 ri sp:plin sp:C sp:E
PFX i   ri r ri[^sy] sp:spotch
PFX i   ri r ris[^s] sp:spotch
PFX i   ris r riss sp:spotch
PFX i   riy ri riy[^iî] sp:spotch
PFX i   ri r riy[iî] sp:spotch
PFX i   ri er ri[^s] sp:plin sp:O
PFX i   ri er ris[^s] sp:plin sp:O
PFX i   ris er riss sp:plin sp:O
PFX i   riy eri riy[^iî] sp:plin sp:O
PFX i   ri er riy[iî] sp:plin sp:O
PFX i   si s si[^y] sp:spotch
PFX i   Si S Si[^y] sp:spotch
PFX i   siy si siy[^iî] sp:spotch
PFX i   si s siy[iî] sp:spotch
PFX i   si es si[^y] sp:plin sp:O
PFX i   tchi tch tchi[^y] sp:spotch
PFX i   ti t ti[^y] sp:spotch
PFX i   vi v vi[^y] sp:spotch
PFX i   0 0 co sp:plin sp:O sp:C
PFX i   co c co[^hseéèêiî] sp:spotch
PFX i   co k co[heéèêiî] sp:spotch
PFX i   co c cos[^cs] sp:spotch
PFX i   cos c coss sp:spotch
PFX i   co ki co sp:plin sp:E
PFX i   po p po sp:spotch
PFX i   to t to sp:spotch
PFX i   vo v vo sp:spotch
PFX i   du d du sp:spotch
PFX i   lu l lu sp:spotch
PFX i   mu m mu sp:spotch
PFX i   pu p pu sp:spotch
PFX i   ru r ru sp:spotch
PFX i   vu v vu sp:spotch
PFX i   sch esch sch sp:plin sp:O



PFX P Y 8
PFX P   0 ri [^aåâeéêèiîoôuûy]
PFX P   0 r [^r]
PFX P   0 ra [^aåâeéêèiîoôuûy]
PFX P   0 raca [^aåâeéêèiîoôuûy]
PFX P   0 dis .
PFX P   0 co [^aåâeéêèiîoôuûy]
PFX P   0 ki [^aåâeéêèiîoôuûy]
PFX P   0 c [^ck]




SFX j Y 25
SFX j   é aedje/o* [^cku]é
SFX j   cé çaedje/o* cé
SFX j   ké caedje/o* ké
SFX j   ué aedje/o* gué
SFX j   î aedje/o* [^ckuy]î
SFX j   cî çaedje/o* cî
SFX j   kî caedje/o* kî
SFX j   uî aedje/o* guî
SFX j   yî iaedje/o* [^aåâeéêègiîoôuû]yî
SFX j   yî yaedje/o* [aåâeéêèiîoôuû]yî
SFX j   yî uiaedje/o* gyî
SFX j   i aedje/o* [^cku]i
SFX j   ci çaedje/o* ci
SFX j   ki caedje/o* ki
SFX j   ui aedje/o* gui
SFX j   0 aedje/o* ixh
SFX j   ou aedje/o* [^h]ou
SFX j   ou aedje/o* [^j]hou
SFX j   ou aedje/o* [^é]jhou
SFX j   éjhou ijhaedje/o* éjhou
SFX j   t jhaedje/o* [^îû]t
SFX j   ît ijhaedje/o* ît
SFX j   ût ujhaedje/o* ût
SFX j ez aedje/o* ez
SFX j oz aedje/o* oz


SFX c Y 60
SFX c   é ance [^cku]é
SFX c   cé çance cé
SFX c   ké cance ké
SFX c   ué ance gué
SFX c   î ance [^ckuy]î
SFX c   cî çance cî
SFX c   kî cance kî
SFX c   uî ance guî
SFX c   yî iance [^aåâeéêègiîoôuû]yî
SFX c   yî yance [aåâeéêèiîoôuû]yî
SFX c   yî uiance gyî
SFX c   i ance [^cku]i
SFX c   ci çance ci
SFX c   ki cance ki
SFX c   ui ance gui
SFX c   0 ance ixh
SFX c   ou ance [^h]ou
SFX c   ou ance [^j]hou
SFX c   ou ance [^é]jhou
SFX c   éjhou ijhance éjhou
SFX c   t jhance [^îû]t
SFX c   ît ijhance ît
SFX c   ût ujhance ût
SFX c   é ances [^cku]é
SFX c   cé çances cé
SFX c   ké cances ké
SFX c   ué ances gué
SFX c   î ances [^ckuy]î
SFX c   cî çances cî
SFX c   kî cances kî
SFX c   uî ances guî
SFX c   yî iances [^aåâeéêègiîoôuû]yî
SFX c   yî yances [aåâeéêèiîoôuû]yî
SFX c   yî uiances gyî
SFX c   i ances [^cku]i
SFX c   ci çances ci
SFX c   ki cances ki
SFX c   ui ances gui
SFX c   0 ances ixh
SFX c   ou ances [^h]ou
SFX c   ou ances [^j]hou
SFX c   ou ances [^é]jhou
SFX c   éjhou ijhances éjhou
SFX c   t jhances [^îû]t
SFX c   ît ijhances ît
SFX c   ût ujhances ût
SFX c es rece [^cksu]es
SFX c ces çrece ces
SFX c kes crece kes
SFX c es rece [^g]ues
SFX c gues grece gues
SFX c es rece [^s]ses
SFX c ses rece sses
SFX c es reces [^cksu]es
SFX c ces çreces ces
SFX c kes creces kes
SFX c es reces [^g]ues
SFX c gues greces gues
SFX c es reces [^s]ses
SFX c ses reces sses


SFX t Y 69
SFX t   é ant/s* [^cku]é po:addj is:o
SFX t   cé çant/s* cé po:addj is:o
SFX t   ké cant/s* ké po:addj is:o
SFX t   ué ant/s* gué po:addj is:o
SFX t   î ant/s* [^ckuy]î po:addj is:o
SFX t   cî çant/s* cî po:addj is:o
SFX t   kî cant/s* kî po:addj is:o
SFX t   uî ant/s* guî po:addj is:o
SFX t   yî iant/s* [^aåâeéêègiîoôuû]yî po:addj is:o
SFX t   yî yant/s* [aåâeéêèiîoôuû]yî po:addj is:o
SFX t   yî uiant/s* gyî po:addj is:o
SFX t   i ant/s* [^cku]i po:addj is:o
SFX t   ci çant/s* ci po:addj is:o
SFX t   ki cant/s* ki po:addj is:o
SFX t   ui ant/s* gui po:addj is:o
SFX t   0 ant/s* ixh po:addj is:o
SFX t   ou ant/s* [^h]ou po:addj is:o
SFX t   ou ant/s* [^j]hou po:addj is:o
SFX t   ou ant/s* [^é]jhou po:addj is:o
SFX t   éjhou ijhant/s* éjhou po:addj is:o
SFX t   t jhant/s* [^îû]t po:addj is:o
SFX t   ît ijhant/s* ît po:addj is:o
SFX t   ût ujhant/s* ût po:addj is:o
SFX t   é ante/s* [^cku]é po:addj is:f
SFX t   cé çante/s* cé po:addj is:f
SFX t   ké cante/s* ké po:addj is:f
SFX t   ué ante/s* gué po:addj is:f
SFX t   î ante/s* [^ckuy]î po:addj is:f
SFX t   cî çante/s* cî po:addj is:f
SFX t   kî cante/s* kî po:addj is:f
SFX t   uî ante/s* guî po:addj is:f
SFX t   yî iante/s* [^aåâeéêègiîoôuû]yî po:addj is:f
SFX t   yî yante/s* [aåâeéêèiîoôuû]yî po:addj is:f
SFX t   yî uiante/s* gyî po:addj is:f
SFX t   i ante/s* [^cku]i po:addj is:f
SFX t   ci çante/s* ci po:addj is:f
SFX t   ki cante/s* ki po:addj is:f
SFX t   ui ante/s* gui po:addj is:f
SFX t   0 ante/s* ixh po:addj is:f
SFX t   ou ante/s* [^h]ou po:addj is:f
SFX t   ou ante/s* [^j]hou po:addj is:f
SFX t   ou ante/s* [^é]jhou po:addj is:f
SFX t   éjhou ijhante/s* éjhou po:addj is:f
SFX t   t jhante/s* [^îû]t po:addj is:f
SFX t   ît ijhante/s* ît po:addj is:f
SFX t   ût ujhante/s* ût po:addj is:f
SFX t   é ant/a* [^cku]é
SFX t   cé çant/a* cé
SFX t   ké cant/a* ké
SFX t   ué ant/a* gué
SFX t   î ant/a* [^ckuy]î
SFX t   cî çant/a* cî
SFX t   kî cant/a* kî
SFX t   uî ant/a* guî
SFX t   yî iant/a* [^aåâeéêègiîoôuû]yî
SFX t   yî yant/a* [aåâeéêèiîoôuû]yî
SFX t   yî uiant/a* gyî
SFX t   i ant/a* [^cku]i
SFX t   ci çant/a* ci
SFX t   ki cant/a* ki
SFX t   ui ant/a* gui
SFX t   0 ant/a* ixh
SFX t   ou ant/a* [^h]ou
SFX t   ou ant/a* [^j]hou
SFX t   ou ant/a* [^é]jhou
SFX t   éjhou ijhant/a* éjhou
SFX t   t jhant/a* [^îû]t
SFX t   ît ijhant/a* ît
SFX t   ût ujhant/a* ût


SFX m Y 34
SFX m   es mint/o* [^ckosu]es
SFX m   ces çmint/o* ces
SFX m   kes cmint/o* kes
SFX m   s mint/o* oes
SFX m   es mint/o* [^s]ses
SFX m   ses mint/o* sses
SFX m   ues mint/o* ues
SFX m   s mint/o* [^eiuû]s
SFX m   us mint/o* ous
SFX m   oûs ômint/o* oûs
SFX m   s mint/o* [^eo][uû]s
SFX m   0 mint/o* ixh
SFX m   rès mint/o* rès
SFX m 0 0 mint po:adv
SFX m   e mint [^bckosu]e po:adv
SFX m   e mint [^å]be po:adv
SFX m   e lumint åbe po:adv
SFX m   ce çmint ce po:adv
SFX m   ke cmint ke po:adv
SFX m   0 mint oe po:adv
SFX m   e mint [^s]se po:adv
SFX m   se mint sse po:adv
SFX m   ue mint gue po:adv
SFX m   s zmint eus po:adv
SFX m   0 lmint å po:adv
SFX m   0 nmint in po:adv
SFX m   f vmint f po:adv
SFX m   k cmint k po:adv
SFX m   é êymint é po:adv
SFX m   i eymint i po:adv
SFX m   î eymint î po:adv
SFX m   0 mint [^åeéfhiîknst] po:adv
SFX m   t mint ant po:adv
SFX m   0 mint [^n]t po:adv
