languagetool-language-modules/wa/src/main/resources/org/languagetool/resource/wa/hunspell/wa_BE.dic
abeymint/m*
abitouwé/vacj*	st:abitouwer
abolixh/vjm	..MS.
aboutixh/vjmt	..MS.
acertiné/vajc*	st:acertiner
acomunyî/vj*	st:acomunyî
acostumé/vacj*	st:acostumer
acrotches/vm*	st:acrotchî
acrotchî/vaj*	st:acrotchî
acsegnî/vajc*	st:acsegnî
acåblé/vat
adawyî/vt*	st:adawyî
addjectif/om
adjixh/vtm
adjnoyî/vj*	st:adjnoyî
adoûcixh/vmj
advinou/aj
aflåwixh/vajtm*	st:aflåwi
aflûtyî/vt*	st:aflûtyî
afrankixh/vajm*	st:afranki
aglumyî/vj
agrancixh/vt
agritchî/vt
aguintches/vm
ahessî/vjcat
ahouwé/jv	(I. waeranti; II. gueuyî)
ahåyî/vtc
aidî/vjc
alouwé/vjat
amaké/vat
amidré/vjtc
amiståve/am	[addj. & adv.] 
ancyin/am	[addj. & adv.]
anichté/vjt
anichî/vjt
anoyî/vatc
aplaké/vj
apåjhes/vm
araedjî/vtam
arimé/vaj
aroyes/vm
asblawixh/vajtm
aschoûté/vajtc
asglignî/vj
ashonné/vjt
askepyî/vajc
aspité/vt
assaetchî/vac
assouwé/vj
astokes/vm
atiré/vct
atrapé/vaj
atôtchî/vc
avilixh/vt	(rabaxhî)
aviyixh/vtm
avizé/vcam	.H.S. 
awaitî/vj
balances/vm
bastixh/vaj	(costrure)
bedivé/vt
behoté/vt
betchté/vj
biesse/afm*
blawté/vt
blinké/vc
bloncî/vj
boerlé/vjt
bolou/vat
bouté/vj
brouxhire/am*
broûlé/vajt
bruteyes/vm
bwestyî/vj
båcté/vt
båyî/vt
cafté/vj
candjî/vatj
carculé/vaj
chitroumfe/si	...S.
chômé/vj
clair/am
cobalancî/vij
cobîles/vi
codût/vicj
coinrece/am
coixhî/vat
comeles/vi
conoxhou/viac
consulté/vja
convnou/ac
copeté/vi
corones/vm
coschiré/vaji
coschuré/vi
cossiné/viat
cotrawé/vi
crankyî/vj
croeyou/c
croxhî/vajt
crucifyî/vaj
cwénzinme/am
decidé/vaj
deujhinme/am
didjunes/vi
dijh-ûtinme/am
dijhèt-st/i
dilérece/ai	(dilérin)
dimandé/vaij
diné/via
disbugué/vaj
disbåtchî/vact
discandjî/vat
dischindou/vaitj
dischites/vi
discloyou/vaj
discoraedjî/vt
discuté/vaj
disgueuyî/vj
dislaxhî/vjca
dismefiyî/vt
disnukî/vaj
dispinds/vi
displaeces/vm
displaijhou/vat
disrafacé/vaj
diszoumé/vaj
divantrin/ai	[addj.] (k' est pa dvant)
divinmint/m*	(pr:divin'mint)
dizarté/viaj
djenerå/anm*
djoké/vja
djolimint/m*
djouwixh/vjc
doté/vc
dozinme/am
drovou/vja
ecinses/vm
ecoraedjî/vt
edåmé/vaj
egzisté/vat
emetrin/am
eplaidî/vja
erité/vjc
esperé/vac
esplikes/vi
espliké/viatj
etertinou/ac
etimolodjike/am
etroclé/vj
ewal/am
fijhoz/i
finå/am
flairé/vt
forfroyî/vj
foutou/vajt	(foute ou fote ?)
franc/am	(libe)
froyî/vj
golou/am
grawyî/vta
gruzinrès/Vm
hemlé/vj
hoûles/vm
imparfait/am*
infinitif/am
kifroxhes/vi
kipleutyî/vai
kitoirdou/vai
kiviersé/vij
locå/am
mamborné/vc
manoyî/vj
mivé/ia
moenné/vjac
mopliyî/vjt
morfolodjike/am
mouwé/vatc
må/am
médyî/vj
mîtrinnijhî/vtj
net/am
nexhou/vanc
otomatike/am
ovré/vjct
pareuzé/vj	(?? sinse ??)
payes/vm
payî/vat
ployî/vjat
poenneus/am
prandjlé/vj	..MS.
precåcioneus/am*
provnou/ac
prumire/am
péyî/vt
pîtieus/am
rabatou/vaj
racrotches/vm
rafristé/vja
ramidré/vajc
ramidrêyes/vm
raptitixh/vjat	..MS.
rawijhî/vaj
recwårlé/vjt
replaeces/vm
retcherpeté/vj
rezisté/vt
ribastixh/vi	(ricostrure)
riboerlêyes/vi
ricepes/vi
riclepyî/vi
ricnoxhou/vac
ricrouwixh/vi
ridinnut/Vi
ridjetes/vi
ridrouves/vi
ridé/vj
rifrès/iV
riglatixh/vti
rihåynêyes/vi
rilignî/vi
rilåcion/si
rimané/ivac
rimerciynut/iV
rimerciyî/ivajtc
rimimbré/vaic
rimouwes/iv
rimwaistrixh/vti*	st:rimwaistri
riméde/si
rindjes/vm
rindou/vj
rinådes/vi
ripintixh/vi	(fr: repentir)
riploû/i
riprodûs/vi
rishonné/vitc
rishujhou/vai*	st:rishure
risseré/vi
rissouwé/vijta
rissôrtou/i
riståré/vjai
ritchamté/vi
ritourné/vi
rivegnnut/Vi
rivoes/iV
riwalonijhes/iv
riçuvnut/Vi
rovyî/vajc
rôlé/vt
saiwé/vj
sazinme/am
setchixh/vjatm
shijhinme/am
shonné/vtc
sibares/vi
sicanes/vi
siclefé/vi
sicrandixh/vi
sicrotes/vi
sigur/ia
sikepyî/ivjac
simbolike/am	[addj. & adv.]
sipanixh/vij	..MS.
sipanixheure/si	..MS.
sipene/si
sipepieus/aim
sipitron/si	..MS.
sipité/vitj	..MS.
sipot/si	..MS.
sipritchî/viaj
sipårgneu/ai
sitandårdijhes/vi
sitinds/iv
sitoele/is
sitoké/ai
sitoké/vij
sitramtêyes/vi
sitårmint/si
sognî/vat
solide/am
sovnou/ajc
soçné/vj
såvadje/am
taeyî/vta
tchir/am*
tchåforné/vjca
tchåfé/vaj*	st:tchåfer
tinrûle/am
toursiveus/am
transliteré/vaj
troejhinme/am
tuzé/vjac	..MS.
ureus/am
uzé/vajc	(eployî)
viké/vjt
voyî/vc
wangnî/vatj
xhilté/vjt
zinglé/vajt
årtistike/am
